North Carolina, session 2025, HB928.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-407.57(b)(2) reads as rewritten:
"(2) If a student participating in an interscholastic athletic activity exhibits signs
or symptoms consistent with a concussion, the student shall be removed from
the activity at that time and shall not be allowed to return to play or practice
that day. The student shall not return to play or practice on a subsequent day
until the student is evaluated by and receives written clearance for such
participation from one of the following:
…
f. A physical therapist, licensed under Article 18E of Chapter 90 of the
General Statutes."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 23rd day of June, 2025.
s/ Rachel Hunt
President of the Senate
s/ Donna McDowell White
Presiding Officer of the House of Representatives
_____________________________________
Josh Stein
Governor
Approved __________.m. this ______________ day of ___________________, 2025
*H928-v-2*